District of Columbia statutes.
29-203.03

Approval of interest exchange.

(a)

A plan of interest exchange shall not be effective unless it has been approved:

(1)

By a domestic acquired entity:

(A)

In accordance with the requirements, if any, in its organic law and organic rules for approval of an interest exchange;

(B)

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d) of this section, if its organic law or organic rules do not provide for approval of an interest exchange in accordance with the requirements, if any, in its organic law and organic rules for approval of:

(i)

In the case of an entity that is not a business corporation, a merger, as if the interest exchange were a merger; or

(ii)

In the case of a business corporation, a merger requiring approval by a vote of the interest holders of the business corporation, as if the interest exchange were that type of merger; or

(C)

If its organic law or organic rules do not provide for approval of an interest exchange or a merger described in subparagraph (B)(ii) of this paragraph, by all of the interest holders of the entity entitled to vote on or consent to any matter; and

(2)

In a record, by each interest holder of a domestic acquired entity that will have interest holder liability for liabilities that arise after the interest exchange becomes effective, unless, in the case of an entity that is not a business corporation or nonprofit corporation:

(A)

The organic rules of the entity provide in a record for the approval of an interest exchange or a merger in which some or all of its interest holders become subject to interest holder liability by the vote or consent of less than all of the interest holders; and

(B)

The interest holder voted for or consented in a record to that provision of the organic rules or became an interest holder after the adoption of that provision.

(b)

An interest exchange involving a foreign acquired entity shall not be effective unless it is approved by the foreign entity in accordance with the law of the foreign entity’s jurisdiction of formation.

(c)

Except as otherwise provided in its organic law or organic rules, the interest holders of the acquiring entity shall not be required to approve the interest exchange.

(d)

A provision of the organic law of a domestic acquired entity that would permit a merger between the acquired entity and the acquiring entity to be approved without the vote or consent of the interest holders of the acquired entity because of the percentage of interests in the acquired entity held by the acquiring entity shall not apply to approval of an interest exchange under subsection (a)(1)(B) of this section.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(b)(13), 59 DCR 13171
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 substituted “formation” for “organization” in (b).
Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.